Washington statutes.
RCW 36.37.040

Expenditure of funds—Revolving fund—Management of fairs.

The board of county commissioners of any county may appropriate and expend each year such sums of money as they deem advisable and necessary for (1) acquisition of necessary grounds for fairs and world fairs, (2) construction, improvement and maintenance of buildings thereon, (3) payment of fair premiums, and (4) the general maintenance of such fair. The board of county commissioners of any county may also authorize the county auditor to provide a revolving fund to be used by the fair officials for the conduct of the fair. The board of county commissioners may employ persons to assist in the management of fairs or by resolution designate a nonprofit corporation as the exclusive agency to operate and manage such fairs.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.37.040. Prior: 1957 c 124 s 1; 1955 c 297 s 1; prior: (i) 1947 c 184 s 3; 1943 c 101 s 1; 1923 c 83 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2753 1/2. (ii) 1923 c 83 s 1; 1917 c 32 s 4; RRS s 2753.]